Connecticut, session 2026, SB00361.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding the
2 provisions of any special act, any municipal planning commission,
3 zoning commission or combined planning and zoning commission may
4 adopt regulations that allow an applicant to pay a fee to the municipality
5 in lieu of meeting any requirement or condition to construct and
6 maintain a public sidewalk in connection with a proposed development,
7 provided no such application shall be approved by the municipality
8 unless the commission finds the construction of such sidewalk is
9 unnecessary or impractical for such development.
10 (b) Any such regulations shall provide that the amount of such fee
11 shall be determined in accordance with a formula or schedule of fees set
12 forth in such regulations and that no such fee shall be imposed or paid
13 without the consent of the applicant and the commission.
SB361 / File No. 295 1

SB361 File No. 295
14 (c) Any such regulations may limit the areas of the municipality in
15 which a fee in lieu of public sidewalk requirements may be considered.
16 (d) Any fee paid to the municipality pursuant to this section shall be
17 deposited in a fund established by the municipality. Such fund shall be
18 used solely for the construction or maintenance of public sidewalks in
19 the municipality. The proceeds of such fund shall not be used for
20 operating expenses of any kind or be considered a part of the municipal
21 general fund. Expenditures from such fund shall be authorized in the
22 same manner as any other capital expenditure of the municipality. Any
23 income earned by any moneys on deposit in such fund shall accrue to
24 the fund.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PD Joint Favorable
SB361 / File No. 295 2

SB361 File No. 295
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential Potential Potential
Revenue
Gain
Explanation
The bill allows municipalities to include a fee in their zoning
regulations that developers can pay in lieu of sidewalk construction if it
meets certain criteria. This results in a potential revenue gain to
municipalities beginning in FY 27 to the extent fees are paid. Any
revenue gain is dependent on the number of fees in lieu of sidewalk
construction and the amount.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of fees.
SB361 / File No. 295 3

SB361 File No. 295
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 361
AN ACT CONCERNING FEES IN LIEU OF SIDEWALK
REQUIREMENTS.